Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.020

Definitions.

The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Authorized metropolitan function" means a metropolitan function which a metropolitan municipal corporation shall have been authorized to perform in the manner provided in this chapter.

(2) "Central city" means the city with the largest population in a metropolitan area.

(3) "Central county" means the county containing the city with the largest population in a metropolitan area.

(4) "City" means an incorporated city or town.

(5) "City council" means the legislative body of any city or town.

(6) "City-owned transit system" means a system of public transportation owned or operated, including contracts for the services of a publicly owned or operated system of transportation, by a city that is not located within the boundaries of a metropolitan municipal corporation, county transportation authority, or public transportation benefit area.

(7) "Component city" means an incorporated city or town within a metropolitan area.

(8) "Component county" means a county, all or part of which is included within a metropolitan area.

(9) "Metropolitan area" means the area contained within the boundaries of a metropolitan municipal corporation, or within the boundaries of an area proposed to be organized as such a corporation.

(10) "Metropolitan council" means the legislative body of a metropolitan municipal corporation, or the legislative body of a county which has by ordinance or resolution assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a metropolitan municipal corporation pursuant to the provisions of chapter 36.56 RCW.

(11) "Metropolitan function" means any of the functions of government named in RCW 35.58.050.

(12) "Metropolitan municipal corporation" means a municipal corporation of the state of Washington created pursuant to this chapter, or a county which has by ordinance or resolution assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a metropolitan municipal corporation pursuant to the provisions of chapter 36.56 RCW.

(13) "Metropolitan public transportation" or "metropolitan transportation" for the purposes of this chapter means the transportation of packages, passengers, and their incidental baggage by means other than by chartered bus, sightseeing bus, or any other motor vehicle not on an individual fare-paying basis, together with the necessary passenger terminals and parking facilities or other properties necessary for passenger and vehicular access to and from such people-moving systems: PROVIDED, That nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a metropolitan municipal corporation from leasing its buses to private certified carriers; to prohibit a metropolitan municipal corporation from providing school bus service for the transportation of pupils; or to prohibit a metropolitan municipal corporation from chartering an electric streetcar on rails which it operates entirely within a city.

(14) "Pollution" has the meaning given in RCW 90.48.020.

(15) "Population" means the number of residents as shown by the figures released for the most recent official state, federal, or county census, or population determination made under the direction of the office of financial management.

(16) "Proof of payment" means evidence of fare prepayment authorized by a metropolitan municipal corporation or a city-owned transit system for the use of buses or other modes of public transportation.

(17) "Special district" means any municipal corporation of the state of Washington other than a city, county, or metropolitan municipal corporation.

[ 2008 c 123 s 5; 1982 c 103 s 1; 1979 c 151 s 28; 1977 ex.s. c 277 s 12. Prior: 1974 ex.s. c 84 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 70 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 303 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.020; prior: 1957 c 213 s 2.]

NOTES:

Alphabetization—2008 c 123: "The code reviser shall alphabetize and renumber the definitions in RCW 35.58.020 and 36.57A.010." [ 2008 c 123 s 11.]

Severability—Construction—Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 277: See RCW 36.56.900 and 36.56.910.

Population determinations, office of financial management: Chapter 43.62 RCW.